Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 12 Conditional Escheat of Unclaimed Funds in Court Registries

8-12-1.
Report of unclaimed funds in court registries.

The clerks of the supreme, superior, family, district, workers’ compensation courts and the traffic tribunal shall, every year during the month of July, return to the state court administrator those funds which have been on deposit in the registry of the respective court for a period of five (5) years or more as of the last business day of June of that year. A sworn statement listing all money or funds shall also be submitted.

The statement shall contain as to each deposit or fund:

The number and title of the case and the date of the order entered on the case in accordance with which the money was paid into the registry of the court;

The name and address of the person, persons, firm, or corporation who paid the money into the registry of the court so far as the name and address appears of record;

The name and address of the person, persons, firm, or corporation entitled to the money in the registry so far as the name and address appear of record in the case or are otherwise known to the clerk;

The amount and date of the deposit in the registry of the court and the amount including accretions from interest or otherwise at the date of the statement; and

An assertion as to whether or not any claim to the deposit or fund or portion thereof is being actively prosecuted by any person and/or whether such claim has been made during the five (5) years prior to the last business day of June of that year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 100, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 238, § 1.

8-12-2.
Deposit of unclaimed funds.

If, upon examination of the sworn statement required to be filed by the several clerks under the provisions of §

8-12-1

, it appears to the state court administrator that there are deposits in the registry of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, the workers’ compensation court and/or the traffic tribunal that have been unclaimed by any person prima facie entitled to the deposits, or his or her or its representative, for a period of five (5) years preceding the last business day of June of the then current year, then all of those unclaimed deposits in the registry of the applicable court, together with any interest on the deposit, shall be paid to the general fund to be held and used by the administrator of the state courts as approved by the chief justice of the supreme court subject to being repaid to the person(s), firm(s) or corporation(s) who may subsequently establish a lawful right to the deposit as provided in §

8-12-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 100, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 2000, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 238, § 1.

8-12-3.
Claim for escheated funds.

Any person who claims a right to money or funds paid to the general fund by the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, the workers’ compensation court and/or the traffic tribunal pursuant to §

8-12-2

, may file a complaint in the superior court within and for the county of Providence within three (3) years after the funds are deposited in the general fund. The complaint shall be subject to the superior court rules of civil procedure and shall follow the course of equity. The complaint shall be filed against the state, and service of process shall be made upon the administrator of the state courts in person or at his or her respective office with someone in charge of the office. The attorney general shall appear and represent the state in the action. The superior court shall hear the complaint, and in case the final determination of the complaint is in favor of the plaintiff, the court shall enter its judgment directing the administrator of the state courts to repay to the plaintiff so much of the fund as the plaintiff has shown himself or herself entitled to receive, together with interest at a rate not to exceed six percent (6%) per annum on that amount, together with the costs of the action as taxed, in accordance with the rules of civil procedure. The interest shall begin to accumulate on the date the sum is received by the general fund and shall cease on the earlier of fifteen (15) years following receipt or the date on which payment is made to the owner. Upon issuance of the order, the clerk shall immediately forward to the administrator of the state courts the execution based upon the judgment and including costs as taxed. The general fund will pay the amount named in the execution to the party entitled to the amount.

In case the action is determined in favor of the state, the determination shall operate as a final bar against the claimant or his or her or its representatives. In the event the action is decided in favor of the claimant, review may be had by the supreme court in its discretion on petition for writ of certiorari, which must be filed within twenty (20) days by the attorney general following the judgment of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 100, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 238, § 1.